Massachusetts, session 194th, H1985.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Paragraph (a) of section 9 of chapter 123 is hereby amended by striking out 
the words, “appellate division of the district courts” and inserting in place thereof the 
words:- "Appeals Court". 
SECTION 2. Paragraph (a) of section 9 of chapter 123 is hereby amended by inserting a 
new sentence after “generally” : “Commitments based on alcohol or substance abuse disorder 
pursuant to chapter 123, section 35 may initially be reviewed by the Superior Court in the same 
manner as reviews of pre-trial detentions for dangerousness pursuant to chapter 276, section 
58A.” 
SECTION 3. Paragraph 1 of section 10 of chapter 211A is hereby amended by inserting a 
new clause after the words “the District Court department criminal session” : “the District Court 
and Boston Municipal Court civil session, relative to orders of civil commitment only.”